Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 10. GENERAL GOVERNMENT

SUBTITLE F. STATE AND LOCAL CONTRACTS AND FUND MANAGEMENT

CHAPTER 2271. PROHIBITION ON CONTRACTS WITH COMPANIES BOYCOTTING ISRAEL

Sec. 2271.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Boycott Israel" has the meaning assigned by Section 808.001.

(2) "Company" has the meaning assigned by Section 808.001, except that the term does not include a sole proprietorship.

(3) "Governmental entity" has the meaning assigned by Section 2251.001.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (H.B. 89), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 30 (H.B. 793), Sec. 1, eff. May 7, 2019.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2270 by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 467 (H.B. 4170), Sec. 21.001(35), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 2271.002. PROVISION REQUIRED IN CONTRACT. (a) This section applies only to a contract that:

(1) is between a governmental entity and a company with 10 or more full-time employees; and

(2) has a value of $100,000 or more that is to be paid wholly or partly from public funds of the governmental entity.

(b) A governmental entity may not enter into a contract with a company for goods or services unless the contract contains a written verification from the company that it:

(1) does not boycott Israel; and

(2) will not boycott Israel during the term of the contract.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (H.B. 89), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 30 (H.B. 793), Sec. 2, eff. May 7, 2019.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2270 by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 467 (H.B. 4170), Sec. 21.001(35), eff. September 1, 2019.